Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 10. Size and Weight Limits

Cross references. —

As to liability for damage to street, highway or bridge from violation of weight or height limitations, see §

31-12-103

.

For present provisions concerning size and weight limits, see §§

31-18-801

through

31-18-808

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d Automobiles and Highway Traffic §§ 232 to 237; 8 Am. Jur. 2d Automobiles and Highway Traffic § 839.

Violation of regulation governing size or weight of motor vehicles, or combinations of vehicles and loads, on the highway as basis of liability for personal injury, death or damage to private property, 21 ALR3d 989.

Federal regulation of tractor-trailer configuration under the Surface Transportation Assistance Act of 1982 (49 USC Appx § 2301 et seq.) [ 49 USC § 31101 et seq.], 77 ALR Fed 350.

60 C.J.S. Motor Vehicles §§ 43, 44.

§§ 31-5-1001 and 31-5-1002.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §§

31-18-801

and

31-18-802

by Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 3.

§ 31-5-1003.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

31-18-803

by Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 4.

§§ 31-5-1004 and 31-5-1005.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §§

31-18-804

and

31-18-805

by Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 3.

§ 31-5-1006.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

31-18-806

by Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 4.

§§ 31-5-1007 and 31-5-1008.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §§

31-18-807

and

31-18-808

by Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 3.

§ 31-5-1009.
Prohibition of triple trailers.

Except for the provisions of W.S.

31-18-808

and 31-18-803(a) no vehicle combination composed of more than three (3) single vehicles shall operate by special permit, test permit, or otherwise on the highways of this state.

History.

1993 Initiative No. 2, § 1; Laws 2007, ch. 126, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “and 31-18-803(a)” for “, after July 1, 1993,” following “W.S.

31-18-808

.”

Editor's notes. —

This section was enacted by initiative, approved by the voters on November 3, 1992, certified by the secretary of state on November 12, 1992, and effective February 10, 1993.